Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1045
911 call, defined.

911 call means any form of communication requesting any type of emergency services by contacting a public safety answering point, including voice or nonvoice communications as well as transmission of any analog or digital data. 911 call includes a voice call, video call, text message, or data-only call.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1017;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 27.